North Carolina, session 2025, HB614.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The Michael Mitchke F.I.N.E. Law."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-389(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The Chief Medical Examiner or a competent pathologist designated by the Chief
Medical Examiner shall perform an autopsy or other study in each of the following cases:
(1) If, in the opinion of the medical examiner investigating the case or of the Chief
Medical Examiner, it is advisable and in the public interest that an autopsy or
other study be made.
(2) If an autopsy or other study is requested by the district attorney of the county
or by any superior court judge.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, in any case in which the
district attorney of the county asserts to the Chief Medical Examiner or the
medical examiner of the county in which the body was located that there is
probable cause to believe that a violation of G.S. 14-18.4 has occurred, a
complete autopsy shall be performed. The district attorney has at least 72
weekday hours after pronouncement of death by a person authorized under
this Part to express the opinion that death has occurred to make the assertion
required by this subdivision, provided that the district attorney or the
investigating law enforcement agency provides notification within the first 24
hours after the pronouncement that such an assertion might be made. The
district attorney may, but is not required to, assert to the Chief Medical
Examiner the facts supporting probable cause to believe that a violation of
G.S. 14-18.4 has occurred.
(4) In any case related to a fire incident in which human remains are found.
A complete autopsy report of findings and interpretations, prepared on forms designated for
the purpose, shall be submitted promptly to the Chief Medical Examiner. Subject to the
limitations of G.S. 130A-389.1 relating to photographs and video or audio recordings of an
autopsy, a copy of the report shall be furnished to any person upon request."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to cases
arising on or after that date.
*H614-v-1*